Florida, session 2026, HB15.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 491.023, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb15-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 15 2026
491.023 Social Work Licensure Interstate Compact; public
records and meetings exemptions.—
(1) A social worker's personal identifying information,
other than the social worker's name, licensure status, or
licensure number, obtained from the data system, as described in
Art. XI of s. 491.022, and held by the department or the board
is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
Constitution unless the state that originally reported the
information to the data system authorizes the disclosure of such
information by law. If disclosure is so authorized, such
information may be disclosed only to the extent authorized by
the law of the reporting state.
(2)(a) A meeting or a portion of a meeting of the Social
Work Licensure Compact Commission or the executive committee or
other committee of the commission, established in Article X of
s. 491.022, at which matters specifically exempted from
disclosure by federal or state law is exempt from s. 286.011 and
s. 24(b), Art. I of the State Constitution.
(b) Recordings, minutes, and records generated during an
exempt meeting or portion of such a meeting are exempt from s.
119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
(3) This section is subject to the Open Government Sunset
Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed
on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
through reenactment by the Legislature.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb15-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 15 2026
Section 2. (1) The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that a social worker's personal identifying
information, other than the social worker's name, licensure
status, or licensure number, obtained from the data system, as
described in Article XI of s. 491.022, Florida Statutes, and
held by the Department of Health or the Board of Clinical Social
Work, Marriage and Family Therapy, and Mental Health Counseling
be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s.
24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. Protection of such
information is required under the Social Work Licensure
Interstate Compact, which a state must adopt in order to become
a member state of the compact. Without the public records
exemption, this state will be unable to effectively implement
and administer the compact.
(2)(a) The Legislature finds that it is a public necessity
that any meeting of the Social Work Licensure Compact Commission
or the executive committee or other committee of the commission
held as provided in s. 491.022, Florida Statutes, in which
matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or
state law are discussed be made exempt from s. 286.011, Florida
Statutes, and s. 24(b), Article I of the State Constitution.
(b) The Social Work Licensure Interstate Compact requires
the closure of any meeting, or any portion of a meeting, of the
Social Work Licensure Compact Commission or the executive
committee or other committee of the commission if the presiding
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb15-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 15 2026
officer announces in a public meeting that, in connection with
the performance of the commission's duties, the commission must
discuss certain sensitive and confidential subject matters. In
the absence of a public meetings exemption, this state would be
prohibited from becoming a member state of the compact.
(3) The Legislature also finds that it is a public
necessity that the recordings, minutes, and records generated
during a meeting held as provided in s. 491.022, Florida
Statutes, that is exempt from public meetings requirements be
made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a),
Article I of the State Constitution. Release of such information
would negate the public meetings exemption. As such, the
Legislature finds that the public records exemption is a public
necessity.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 13 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb15-00